Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.5. Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act.

§ 62.1-44.15:67.
Cooperative state-local program.

Healthy state and local economies and a healthy Chesapeake Bay are integrally related; balanced economic development and water quality protection are not mutually exclusive. The protection of the public interest in the Chesapeake Bay, its tributaries, and other state waters and the promotion of the general welfare of the people of the Commonwealth require that (i) the counties, cities, and towns of Tidewater Virginia incorporate general water quality protection measures into their comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, and subdivision ordinances; (ii) the counties, cities, and towns of Tidewater Virginia establish programs, in accordance with criteria established by the Commonwealth, that define and protect certain lands, hereinafter called Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas, which if improperly developed may result in substantial damage to the water quality of the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries; (iii) the Commonwealth make its resources available to local governing bodies by providing financial and technical assistance, policy guidance, and oversight when requested or otherwise required to carry out and enforce the provisions of this article; and (iv) all agencies of the Commonwealth exercise their delegated authority in a manner consistent with water quality protection provisions of local comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, and subdivision ordinances when it has been determined that they comply with the provisions of this article.

Local governments have the initiative for planning and for implementing the provisions of this article, and the Commonwealth shall act primarily in a supportive role by providing oversight for local governmental programs, by establishing criteria as required by this article, and by providing those resources necessary to carry out and enforce the provisions of this article.

Each local government in Tidewater Virginia shall publish on its website the elements and criteria adopted to implement its local plan as required by this article, including those elements and criteria required by 9VAC25-830-60 for local programs.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2100; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2022, c. 207.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, recodified Article 1 (§ 10.1-603.1 et seq.) of Chapter 21 of Title 10.1, as Article 2.5 (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 6 provides: “Regulations of the regulatory boards served by (i) the Department of Labor and Industry pursuant to Title 40.1 and (ii) the Department of Professional and Occupational Regulation or the Department of Health Professions pursuant to Title 54.1 that are limited to reducing fees charged to regulants and applicants.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 7 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to administer and implement the Virginia Stormwater Management Act (§ 10.1-603.1 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§ 10.1- 560 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§ 10.1- 2100 et seq. of the Code of Virginia) are transferred from the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to the State Water Control Board, and the State Water Control Board may amend, modify, or delete provisions in these regulations in order to implement this act. Such regulations shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the State Water Control Board.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 8 provides: “That the initial actions of the State Water Control Board to adopt, with necessary amendments, the regulations implementing the programs being transferred by this act from the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to the State Water Control Board shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. After transfer of the programs, if the State Water Control Board determines that additional amendments to the regulations are necessary solely to enable implementation of the programs in accordance with this act, the regulatory actions necessary shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, except that the Department of Environmental Quality shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulatory actions.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 9 provides: “That any regulatory action initiated by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to amend the programs being transferred by this act may be continued by the State Water Control Board at the time of the program transfer and that the State Water Control Board shall act expeditiously to address all such actions.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 10 provides: “That the full-time employees and the total maximum employment level employed in the administration of the programs being transferred by this act shall be transferred from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Department of Environmental Quality. The Department of Conservation and Recreation is directed to transfer to the Department of Environmental Quality all appropriations, including special funds, for programs identified for transfer by this act. The Department of Environmental Quality is authorized to hire additional staff to operate the programs transferred by this act.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 11 provides: “That 30 days prior to (i) the transfer of any full-time employees and total maximum employment level employed in the administration of the programs being transferred by this act, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall report to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources on such transfers and (ii) the transfer of appropriations, including special funds, for programs identified for transfer in this act, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall report on such transfers. By December 1, 2013, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall also report on the process by which the Department of Environmental Quality will distribute funds to local soil and water conservation districts as provided for in § 319 of the federal Clean Water Act and § 6217 of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 12 provides: “That the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and members of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, appointed by their respective Chairs, shall convene public meetings throughout the Commonwealth to evaluate the role of soil and water conservation districts in providing effective delivery of water quality services and technical assistance. In their deliberations the representatives of the executive branch agencies and legislators shall:

“A. Discuss the provisions of this act and its implications and solicit comments from the public and affected parties;

“B. Determine the extent of the role soil and water conservation districts should play in providing assistance in delivery of water quality services for nonpoint source pollution management and providing technical assistance for such programs as erosion and sediment control and stormwater management; and

“C. Determine whether the mission of soil and water conservation districts is more effectively delivered under the current statutory framework or whether organizational changes would enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of such services.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 13 provides: “That guidance of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, and the former Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board relating to programs to be transferred by this act shall remain in effect until amended or repealed.”

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 14 provides: “That the Secretary of Natural Resources, working with the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, shall take steps to enhance collaboration and communication among the natural resources agencies to ensure the effective and efficient implementation of the Commonwealth’s water quality and soil and water conservation programs.”

Acts 2019, c. 429, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Health shall develop a plan for the oversight and enforcement by the Department of requirements related to the inspection and pump-out of onsite sewage treatment systems that do not require a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit established pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and are located in counties eligible for participation in the Rural Coastal Virginia Community Enhancement Authority pursuant to Chapter 76 (§

15.2-7600

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia. The Department shall present such plan to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health prior to implementing the plan.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 207 added subsection C.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-573. Agreement for Right to Inundate; No. 16-576 Deed of Gift of Conservation Easement; No. 16-579. Deeds of Easement to Local Government for Natural Open Space, Conservation or Rural Preservation.

§ 62.1-44.15:68.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the following words shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them:

“Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area”
means an area delineated by a local government in accordance with criteria established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:72

.

“Criteria”
means criteria developed by the Board pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:72

for the purpose of determining the ecological and geographic extent of Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas and for use by local governments in permitting, denying, or modifying requests to rezone, subdivide, or use and develop land in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas.

“Daylighted stream”
means a stream that had been previously diverted into an underground drainage system, has been redirected into an aboveground channel using natural channel design concepts as defined in §

62.1-44.15:51

, and would meet the criteria for being designated as a Resource Protection Area (RPA) as defined by the Board under this article.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Secretary”
means the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources.

“Tidewater Virginia”
means the following jurisdictions:

The Counties of Accomack, Arlington, Caroline, Charles City, Chesterfield, Essex, Fairfax, Gloucester, Hanover, Henrico, Isle of Wight, James City, King and Queen, King George, King William, Lancaster, Mathews, Middlesex, New Kent, Northampton, Northumberland, Prince George, Prince William, Richmond, Spotsylvania, Stafford, Surry, Westmoreland, and York, and the Cities of Alexandria, Chesapeake, Colonial Heights, Fairfax, Falls Church, Fredericksburg, Hampton, Hopewell, Newport News, Norfolk, Petersburg, Poquoson, Portsmouth, Richmond, Suffolk, Virginia Beach, and Williamsburg.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2101; 2005, c. 41; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2015, c. 674; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 1, effective until January 1, 2018, provides: “§ 1. That the Commonwealth Center for Recurrent Flooding Resiliency shall convene a work group to examine opportunities to improve stormwater management in rural localities that are located in Tidewater Virginia, as defined in §

62.1-44.15:68

of the Code of Virginia. The work group shall review and consider alternative methods that could be used in such localities to meet or exceed the level of water quality protection and water quantity control provided by the Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) Regulation, 9VAC25-870, including (i) the creation of rural development growth areas within such localities, in which stormwater management could be administered by the localities using different approaches than those set forth in the VSMP Regulation; (ii) the development of a volume credit program to fulfill water quantity requirements; (iii) the payment of fees to support regional stormwater best management practices; and (iv) the allowance of the use of the stormwater in the networks of ditches that line the highways within such localities to generate volume credits.

“§ 2. That the work group created by this act shall be facilitated by the Virginia Coastal Policy Center at William and Mary Law School and shall include representatives of the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, Old Dominion University, the Virginia Department of Transportation, the Virginia Department of Environmental Quality, the Chesapeake Bay Commission, local governments, environmental interests, private mitigation providers, the agriculture industry, the engineering and development communities, and other stakeholders as determined necessary.

“§ 3. That in order to support the efforts of the work group created by this act, the Commonwealth Center for Recurrent Flooding Resiliency shall provide comprehensive analysis of the appropriate regulatory sections, and alternatives developed by the work group, with the goal of determining the difference in water quality benefits provided.

“§ 4. That the Commonwealth Center for Recurrent Flooding Resiliency shall report the results of the examination conducted by the work group created by this act, including recommendations for any legislative or regulatory measures needed to improve the administration of stormwater management by rural localities, to the Governor, the Chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, and the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources no later than January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall expire on January 1, 2018.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 674 added the definition for “Daylighted stream.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in the definition for “Secretary.”

§ 62.1-44.15:69.
(For expiration date — see notes) Powers and duties of the Board.

The Board is responsible for carrying out the purposes and provisions of this article and is authorized to:

Provide land use and development and water quality protection information and assistance to the various levels of local, regional, and state government within the Commonwealth.

Consult, advise, and coordinate with the Governor, the Secretary, the General Assembly, other state agencies, regional agencies, local governments, and federal agencies for the purpose of implementing this article.

Provide financial and technical assistance and advice to local governments and to regional and state agencies concerning aspects of land use and development and water quality protection pursuant to this article.

Promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Develop, promulgate, and keep current the criteria required by §

62.1-44.15:72

.

Provide technical assistance and advice or other aid for the development, adoption, and implementation of local comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and other land use and development and water quality protection measures utilizing criteria established by the Board to carry out the provisions of this article.

Develop procedures for use by local governments to designate Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas in accordance with the criteria developed pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:72

.

Ensure that local government comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, and subdivision ordinances are in accordance with the provisions of this article. Determination of compliance shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Make application for federal funds that may become available under federal acts and to transmit such funds when applicable to any appropriate person.

Take administrative and legal actions to ensure compliance by counties, cities, and towns with the provisions of this article including the proper enforcement and implementation of, and continual compliance with, this article.

Perform such other duties and responsibilities related to the use and development of land and the protection of water quality as the Secretary may assign.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2103; 1997, c. 266; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:69

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Constitutionality of amendments of regulations. —

Amendments by the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board to its Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area Designation and Management Regulations do not violate the Equal Protection Clause of the Constitution of the United States. See opinion of Attorney General to W. Leslie Kilduff, Jr., County Attorney for Northumberland County, 02-052, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 73 (10/30/02) (decided under prior law).

§ 62.1-44.15:69.
(For effective date — see notes) Powers and duties of the Board.

The Board is responsible for carrying out the purposes and provisions of this article and is authorized to:

Provide land use and development and water quality protection information and assistance to the various levels of local, regional, and state government within the Commonwealth.

Consult, advise, and coordinate with the Governor, the Secretary, the General Assembly, other state agencies, regional agencies, local governments, and federal agencies for the purpose of implementing this article.

Provide financial and technical assistance and advice to local governments and to regional and state agencies concerning aspects of land use and development and water quality protection pursuant to this article.

Promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Develop, promulgate, and keep current the criteria required by §

62.1-44.15:72

.

Provide technical assistance and advice or other aid for the development, adoption, and implementation of local comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and other land use and development and water quality protection measures utilizing criteria established by the Board to carry out the provisions of this article.

Develop procedures for use by local governments to designate Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas in accordance with the criteria developed pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:72

.

Ensure that local government comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, and subdivision ordinances are in accordance with the provisions of this article. Determination of compliance shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Make application for federal funds that may become available under federal acts and to transmit such funds when applicable to any appropriate person.

Take administrative and legal actions pursuant to subdivision (19) of §

62.1-44.15

to ensure compliance by counties, cities, and towns with the provisions of this article including the proper enforcement and implementation of, and continual compliance with, this article.

Perform such other duties and responsibilities related to the use and development of land and the protection of water quality as the Secretary may assign.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2103; 1997, c. 266; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:69

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and in subdivision 10, inserted “pursuant to subdivision (19) of §

62.1-44.15

.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:70.
Exclusive authority of Board to institute legal actions.

The Board shall have the exclusive authority to institute or intervene in legal and administrative actions to ensure compliance by local governing bodies with this article and with any criteria or regulations adopted hereunder.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2104; 1997, c. 266; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Constitutionality of amendments of regulations. —

Amendments by the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board to its Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area Designation and Management Regulations do not violate the Equal Protection Clause of the Constitution of the United States. See opinion of Attorney General to W. Leslie Kilduff, Jr., County Attorney for Northumberland County, 02-052, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 73 (10/30/02) (decided under prior law).

§ 62.1-44.15:71.
(For repeal date — see notes) Program compliance.

Program compliance reviews conducted in accordance with §

62.1-44.15:69

and the regulations associated with this article shall be coordinated where applicable with those being implemented in accordance with the erosion and sediment control and stormwater management provisions of this chapter and associated regulations. The Department may also conduct a comprehensive or partial program compliance review and evaluation of a local government program more frequently than the standard schedule.

Following completion of a compliance review of a local government program, the Department shall provide results and compliance recommendations to the Board in the form of a corrective action agreement should deficiencies be found; otherwise, the Board may find the program compliant. When deficiencies are found, the Board will establish a schedule for the local government to come into compliance. The Board shall provide a copy of its decision to the local government that specifies the deficiencies, actions needed to be taken, and the approved compliance schedule. If the local government has not implemented the necessary compliance actions identified by the Board within 30 days following receipt of the corrective action agreement, or such additional period as is granted to complete the implementation of the compliance actions, then the Board shall have the authority to issue a special order to any local government imposing a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per day with the maximum amount not to exceed $20,000 per violation for noncompliance with the state program, to be paid into the state treasury and deposited in the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established by §

62.1-44.15:29

.

The Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall govern the activities and proceedings of the Board under this article and the judicial review thereof.

In lieu of issuing a special order, the Board is also authorized to take legal action against a local government to ensure compliance.

History.

2012, cc. 785, 819, § 10.1-2104.1; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Contingent repeal date.

This section is repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption of regulations required by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2,
provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:72.
Board to develop criteria.

In order to implement the provisions of this article and to assist counties, cities, and towns in regulating the use and development of land and in protecting the quality of state waters, the Board shall promulgate regulations that establish criteria for use by local governments to determine the ecological and geographic extent of Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas. The Board shall also promulgate regulations that establish criteria for use by local governments in granting, denying, or modifying requests to rezone, subdivide, or use and develop land in these areas.

In developing and amending the criteria, the Board shall consider all factors relevant to the protection of water quality from significant degradation as a result of the use and development of land. The criteria shall incorporate measures such as performance standards, best management practices, and various planning and zoning concepts to protect the quality of state waters while allowing use and development of land consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The criteria adopted by the Board, operating in conjunction with other state water quality programs, shall encourage and promote (i) protection of existing high quality state waters and restoration of all other state waters to a condition or quality that will permit all reasonable public uses and will support the propagation and growth of all aquatic life, including game fish, that might reasonably be expected to inhabit them; (ii) safeguarding of the clean waters of the Commonwealth from pollution; (iii) prevention of any increase in pollution; (iv) reduction of existing pollution; (v) preservation of mature trees or planting of trees as a water quality protection tool and as a means of providing other natural resource benefits; (vi) coastal resilience and adaptation to sea-level rise and climate change; and (vii) promotion of water resource conservation in order to provide for the health, safety, and welfare of the present and future citizens of the Commonwealth.

Prior to the development or amendment of criteria, the Board shall give due consideration to, among other things, the economic and social costs and benefits that can reasonably be expected to obtain as a result of the adoption or amendment of the criteria.

In developing such criteria the Board may consult with and obtain the comments of any federal, state, regional, or local agency that has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to the use and development of land or the protection of water. The Board shall give due consideration to the comments submitted by such federal, state, regional, or local agencies.

In developing such criteria, the Board shall provide that any locality in a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area that allows the owner of an onsite sewage treatment system not requiring a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit to submit documentation in lieu of proof of septic tank pump-out shall require such owner to have such documentation certified by an operator or onsite soil evaluator licensed or certified under Chapter 23 (§

54.1-2300

et seq.) of Title 54.1 as being qualified to operate, maintain, or design onsite sewage systems.

In developing such criteria, the Board shall not require the designation of a Resource Protection Area (RPA) as defined according to the criteria developed by the Board, adjacent to a daylighted stream. However, a locality that elects not to designate an RPA adjacent to a daylighted stream shall use a water quality impact assessment to ensure that proposed development on properties adjacent to the daylighted stream does not result in the degradation of the stream. The water quality impact assessment shall (i) be consistent with the Board’s criteria for water quality assessments in RPAs, (ii) identify the impacts of the proposed development on water quality, and (iii) determine specific measures for the mitigation of those impacts. The objective of this assessment is to ensure that practices on properties adjacent to daylighted streams are effective in retarding runoff, preventing erosion, and filtering nonpoint source pollution. The specific content for the water quality impact assessment shall be established and implemented by any locality that chooses not to designate an RPA adjacent to a daylighted stream. Nothing in this subsection shall limit a locality’s authority to include a daylighted stream within the extent of an RPA.

Effective July 1, 2014, requirements promulgated under this article directly related to compliance with the erosion and sediment control and stormwater management provisions of this chapter and regulated under the authority of those provisions shall cease to have effect.

Effective July 1, 2023, requirements promulgated under this article directly related to compliance with onsite sewage system pump-outs shall be managed and enforced by the Department of Health in Accomack, Essex, Gloucester, King and Queen, King William, Lancaster, Mathews, Middlesex, Northampton, Northumberland, Richmond, and Westmoreland Counties, and the incorporated towns within those counties.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2107; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, c. 151; 2015, c. 674; 2020, c. 1207; 2022, c. 486.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1207, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The initial adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. Such proposed regulations shall be subject to a public comment period of at least 60 days prior to final adoption by the Board.”

Acts 2022, c. 486, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health (the Department) shall provide outreach and education to homeowners to ensure compliance with onsite sewage treatment system pump-out requirements adopted pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq. of the Code of Virginia). The Department shall provide to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health an interim report by December 1, 2024, and a final report by December 1, 2025, on compliance with such onsite sewage treatment system pump-out requirements in the localities specified in subsection L of §

32.1-164

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and subsection H of §

62.1-44.15:72

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and the incorporated towns within such localities. Such reports shall also include recommendations to improve compliance with onsite sewage treatment system pump-out requirements adopted pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 151, added subsection E and redesignated former subsection E as subsection F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 674 added subsection F and redesignated former subsection F as subsection G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1207, in subsection B in the last sentence, substituted “safeguarding of the clean waters” for “safeguarding the clean waters” in clause (ii), inserted clauses (v) and (vi), and redesignated former clause (v) as clause (vii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 486 added subsection H and made stylistic changes.

§ 62.1-44.15:73.
Local government authority.

Counties, cities, and towns are authorized to exercise their police and zoning powers to protect the quality of state waters consistent with the provisions of this article.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2108; 2013, cc. 756, 793.